Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1887.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 58ASAFE COMMUNITIES GRANT PROGRAMSec.58A01. Definitions.58A02. Grant program.58A03. Safe Communities Grant Program Fund.58A04. Applications.58A05. Award of program grants.58A06. Reports.123456789101112131415161718 § 58A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"C ommission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Eligible applicant." A municipality located within this Commonwealth that has not received a grant from the program in the previous five years."Fund." The Safe Communities Grant Program Fund established under section 58A03 (relating to Safe Communities Grant Program Fund)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality, optional charter municipality or similar general purpose unit of government that may be created or authorized by statute or school district."Program." The Safe Communities Grant Program established under section 58A02 (relating to grant program).§ 58A02. G rant program. (a) Establishment.--The Safe Communities Grant Program is established as a competitive grant program within the commission.(b) Deposits.--Money appropriated to the program by the General Assembly shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Purpose.--The purpose of the program is to award grants to improve public health and safety around this Commonwealth through the installation and maintenance of lighting or security cameras, or both, in and around high crime areas, as determined by the commission, with priority to be given to schools, 20250HB1887PN2348 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 playgrounds and recreation and senior centers . (d) Administration.--The commission shall administer the program.(e) Public notice.--The commission shall provide information regarding the availability and award of program grant money on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 58A03. Safe Communities Grant Program Fund.(a) E stablishment.--The Safe Communities Grant Program Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(b) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest earned on the money in the fund are appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis to award grants under this chapter.§ 58A04. Applications. (a) Forms.-- The commission shall develop annual grant application forms for any eligible applicants that seek a program grant. At a minimum, the forms shall contain the following information:(1) The name, address and contact information of the municipality.(2) The amount of program grant money requested.(3) The proposed use for the requested program grant money.(4) If applicable, a detailed plan describing the monitoring of any security cameras installed with money from the program.(5) If applicable, a detailed maintenance plan for any lighting installed with money from the program.(6) Any other information that the commission deems necessary and appropriate.20250HB1887PN2348 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Application period.--Beginning no later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, the commission shall begin accepting and processing applications. For all subsequent years, the commission shall establish an application period during which applications for grants under this chapter are accepted.§ 58A05. Award of program grants.(a) Review.--After review of the information provided under each applicant's submitted application form, the commission shall determine whether to award grant program money to the applicant and, if so, the amount of the program grant money awarded.(b) Allocation.--The commission may not award a grant in excess of $25,000 nor provide grants in excess of the amount in the fund.(c) Competitive nature of awards.--Program grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis to eligible applicants. In awarding program grants, the commission shall:(1) Give preference to applicants whose grant proposals demonstrate the greatest likelihood of reducing the number of persons victimized by gun violence in their community.(2) Consider the scope of the applicant's proposal and the applicant's demonstrated need for additional resources to effectively reduce gun violence in the affected municipality.(d) Time periods.--(1) The commission shall approve or deny an application no later than 60 days after the receipt of the application.(2) If the commission fails to approve or deny within 60 days after the receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed denied.20250HB1887PN2348 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) N otice.-- (1) The commission shall provide written notice to the applicant of the award or denial of the program grant money.(2) Notice of the award of program grant money shall include the amount of the program grant money awarded and any conditions or restrictions on the use of the program grant money.(3) Notice of the denial of all or part of the program grant money requested shall include the reasons for the full or partial denial.§ 58A06. Reports. No less than every three years, the commission shall prepare and submit a report to the General Assembly regarding the rate of gun violence in municipalities that received grants from the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1887PN2348 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516